Idaho, session 2025, S1051.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 14, Title 7, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 7-1406A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
7-1406A. GOOD CAUSE DETERMINATION IN LICENSE SUSPENSION PROCEED-
INGS. (1) A motor vehicle or occupational license suspension pursuant to
this chapter shall be denied or stayed if the obligor proves that one (1) or
more of the following conditions for good cause determination exist:
(a) The obligor has been declared physically disabled by the social
security administration, the Idaho industrial commission, or another
competent authority that works with disabled individuals, and the dis-
ability has directly resulted in the current inability to pay the child
support obligation;
(b) The obligor is experiencing the effects of an extended illness or
accident that has directly resulted in the current inability to pay the
child support obligation;
(c) The obligor is a student whose enrollment is a result of a referral
from Idaho vocational rehabilitation, the Idaho industrial commission,
or another competent authority that works with disabled individuals;
(d) The obligor is incarcerated in a county, state, or federal correc-
tional facility and proves that he has no assets;
(e) The obligor is receiving supplemental security income benefits;
(f) The obligor has court-ordered physical custody of all children
listed in the order for support; or
(g) Child support is being collected directly from the obligor's in-
come through an income withholding order issued by the department to the
obligor's employer or other income source.
(2) A recreational license suspension pursuant to this chapter shall
be stayed if the obligor proves either of the following conditions for good
cause determination exist:
(a) The obligor is receiving supplemental security income benefits; or
(b) The obligor has court-ordered physical custody of all children
listed in the order for support.
(3) No condition other than those described in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section shall constitute good cause for a denial or stay of a license


suspension. The following conditions shall not constitute good cause for a
denial or stay of a license suspension:
(a) The obligor is unemployed, underemployed, or has difficulty main-
taining consistent employment;
(b) The obligor claims to be disabled but has not applied for disability
benefits or has been refused disability benefits;
(c) The obligor asserts that the child support obligation is too high;
(d) The obligor has been denied full visitation with the child or chil-
dren; or
(e) The obligor alleges that the obligee misuses the child support.
SECTION 2. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.03.03, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Child Support Services, Section 302. and Ap-
pendix A, shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after the ef-
fective date of this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.